Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 8. Witness Protection Program.

§ 52-35.
Witness protection program established.

The Superintendent of State Police may establish and maintain within the Department of State Police a witness protection program to temporarily relocate or otherwise protect witnesses and their families who may be in danger because of their cooperation with the investigation and prosecution of serious violent crimes, felony violations of §

18.2-248

, and violations of §§

18.2-57.2

,

18.2-67.5:1

,

18.2-67.5:2

, and

18.2-67.5:3

. The Superintendent may make the services of the program available to law-enforcement and criminal justice agencies of all counties, cities, and towns, and of the Commonwealth, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Superintendent under the Administrative Process Act. (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1994, c. 833; 2002, cc. 810, 818.

Cross references.

As to crime victims and witness rights, see §

19.2-11.01

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, cc. 810 and 818, cl. 2 provides: “That the Supreme Court shall establish reasonable judicial training regarding domestic violence and the resources available for victims in the Commonwealth of Virginia.”

Acts 2002, cc. 810 and 818, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commonwealth Attorney’s Services Council shall provide training to attorneys for the Commonwealth regarding the prosecution of domestic violence cases.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and substituted “felony violations of §

18.2-248

, and violations of §§

18.2-57.2

,

18.2-67.5:1

,

18.2-67.5:2

, and

18.2-67.5:3

” for “or felony violations of §

18.2-248

” in the first sentence.